test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_C_zhagay_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nizhagayimiwaaibaning
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nizhagayimiwaaibanan
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nizhagayimiwaaibanag
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nizhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nizhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nizhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhagayiminaanibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhagayiminaanibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhagayiminaanibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gizhagayiminiibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gizhagayiminiibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gizhagayiminiibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gizhagayimiwaaibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gizhagayimiwaaibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gizhagayimiwaaibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhagayiminaanibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhagayiminaanibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhagayiminaanibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ozhagayiminiibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ozhagayiminiibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ozhagayiminiibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayimini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayimini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayimini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ozhagayimiwaaibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ozhagayimiwaaibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ozhagayimiwaaibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: izhagayiminaanibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: izhagayiminaanibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: izhagayiminaanibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: izhagayiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: izhagayiminaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: izhagayiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: izhagayiminiibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: izhagayiminiibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: izhagayiminiibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: izhagayimini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: izhagayimini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: izhagayimini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: izhagayimiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: izhagayimiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: izhagayimiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: izhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: izhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: izhagayimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nizhagayishinaanibaning
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nizhagayishinaanibanan
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nizhagayishinaanibanag
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nizhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nizhagayishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nizhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nizhagayishiniibaning
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nizhagayishiniibanan
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nizhagayishiniibanag
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nizhagayishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nizhagayishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nizhagayishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nizhagayishiwaaibaning
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nizhagayishiwaaibanan
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nizhagayishiwaaibanag
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nizhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nizhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nizhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhagayishinaanibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhagayishinaanibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhagayishinaanibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gizhagayishiniibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gizhagayishiniibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gizhagayishiniibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gizhagayishiwaaibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gizhagayishiwaaibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gizhagayishiwaaibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhagayishinaanibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhagayishinaanibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhagayishinaanibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ozhagayishiniibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ozhagayishiniibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ozhagayishiniibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ozhagayishiwaaibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ozhagayishiwaaibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ozhagayishiwaaibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: izhagayishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: izhagayishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: izhagayishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: izhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: izhagayishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: izhagayishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: izhagayishiniibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: izhagayishiniibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: izhagayishiniibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: izhagayishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: izhagayishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: izhagayishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: izhagayishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: izhagayishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: izhagayishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: izhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: izhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: izhagayishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: zhagayenhimishinaaniban
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: zhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: zhagayenhimishiniiban
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: zhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: zhagayenhimishiwaaiban
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: zhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: zhagayensimishinaaniban
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: zhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: zhagayensimishiniiban
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: zhagayensimishini***idig, idog***
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: zhagayensimishiwaaiban
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: zhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: zhagayenhimishinaaning
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: zhagayenhimishinaanan
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: zhagayenhimishinaanag
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: zhagayenhimishiniing
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: zhagayenhimishinian
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: zhagayenhimishiniag
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: zhagayenhimishiwaaing
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: zhagayenhimishiwaaan
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: zhagayenhimishiwaaag
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: zhagayensimishinaaning
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: zhagayensimishinaanan
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: zhagayensimishinaanag
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: zhagayensimishiniing
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: zhagayensimishinian
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: zhagayensimishiniag
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: zhagayensimishiwaaing
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: zhagayensimishiwaaan
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: zhagayensimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: zhagayenhimishibaning
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: zhagayenhimishibanan
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: zhagayenhimishibanag
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: zhagayenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: zhagayenhimish***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: zhagayenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: zhagayensimishibaning
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: zhagayensimishibanan
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: zhagayensimishibanag
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: zhagayensimish***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: zhagayensimish***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: zhagayensimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: zhagayenhiminaanibaning
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: zhagayenhiminaanibanan
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: zhagayenhiminaanibanag
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: zhagayenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: zhagayenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     zhagay+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: zhagayenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     zhagay+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: zhagayenhiminiibaning
     zhagay+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: zhagayenhiminiibanan
